Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.600

Action on bond by director—Powers of director.

Upon ascertaining all claims and statements in the manner set forth in this chapter, the director may then make demand upon the warehouse operator's or grain dealer's bond on behalf of those claimants whose claims and statements have been filed, and has the power to settle or compromise the claims with the surety company on the bond, and is empowered in such cases to execute and deliver a release and discharge of the bond involved.

[ 2011 c 336 s 639; 1983 c 305 s 59; 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 32.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.